Utah statutes.
20A-3-703.   Election day voting centers as polling places -- Location -- Notification.

The election officer may designate one or more polling places as an election day voting center if:

(1)  the election officer notifies the lieutenant governor of the designation and location of an election day voting center at least 15 days before the election;

(2)  a polling place meets the requirements for a polling place under Chapter 5, Election Administration; and

(3)  a polling place is located in a government building or office, unless the election officer determines that there is no government building or office available, in the area designated by the election officer, that:

(a)  can be scheduled for use during election day voting hours;

(b)  has the physical facilities necessary to accommodate election day voting requirements;

(c)  has adequate space for voting equipment, poll workers, and voters; and

(d)  has adequate security, public accessibility, and parking.



Enacted by Chapter 291, 2011 General Session

